Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8711
Patient safety organization; proceedings and records; restrictions on use; violation; penalty.

No person shall disclose the actions, decisions, proceedings, discussions, or deliberations occurring at a meeting of a patient safety organization except to the extent necessary to carry out one or more of the purposes of a patient safety organization. The proceedings and records of a patient safety organization shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action against a provider arising out of the matter or matters that are the subject of consideration by a patient safety organization. Information, documents, or records otherwise available from original sources shall not be immune from discovery or use in any civil action merely because they were presented during proceedings of a patient safety organization. This section shall not be construed to prevent a person from testifying to or reporting information obtained independently of the activities of a patient safety organization or which is public information. A person who knowingly violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 11.